Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-722
Evaluation of multicultural education program; report.

In conjunction with the multicultural education program prescribed in section 79-720, the State Department of Education shall design a process for evaluating the implementation and effectiveness of each multicultural education program, including the collection of baseline data. The collection of baseline data for evaluating the implementation and effectiveness of each multicultural education program shall not include the testing, assessment, or evaluation of individual students' attitudes or beliefs. An evaluation of the implementation and effectiveness of each multicultural education program shall be conducted during the first quarter of the 1997-98 school year and every five school years thereafter. The department shall report the results of each evaluation to the Legislature, the State Board of Education, and each school district.

Laws 1992, LB 922, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 27, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,232;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 396.